Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 10
COST OF CARE REIMBURSEMENT

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1989. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1994, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1994, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

17-10-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that persons who are convicted of offenses in the state which result in such persons being confined to a local jail or a correctional facility, being sentenced to home detention, being placed on probation by the sentencing court, or being placed on parole by the state board of parole should be required, where appropriate, to reimburse the state or a county or a city and county for the cost of care incurred as a result of such sentence. The general assembly further finds that a convicted person's financial circumstances may be fraudulently misrepresented to the sentencing court or that such circumstances may change after sentencing so that a person who is unable to pay the cost of care at sentencing may be or become able to contribute to the cost of care at a later date.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1359, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 10, § 1, effective July 1.

17-10-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cost of care" means the cost to the department or a county or a city and county charged with the custody of an offender for providing room, board, clothing, medical care, and other normal living expenses for an offender confined to a local jail or a correctional facility, or any costs associated with maintaining an offender in a home detention program contracted for by the department of public safety, as determined by the executive director of the department of corrections or the executive director of the department of public safety, whichever is appropriate, or the cost of supervision of probation when the offender is granted probation, or the cost of supervision of parole when the offender is placed on parole by the state board of parole, as determined by the court.

"Estate" means any tangible or intangible properties, real or personal, belonging to or due to an offender, including income or payments to such person received or earned prior to or during incarceration from salary or wages, bonuses, annuities, pensions, or retirement benefits, or any source whatsoever except federal benefits of any kind. Real property that is held in joint ownership or ownership in common with an offender's spouse, while being used and occupied by the spouse as a place of residence, shall not be considered a part of the estate of the offender for the purposes of this article.

"Offender" means a person confined to a correctional facility or a local jail as the result of a conviction of a crime or to home detention, a person placed on probation by the sentencing court, or a person placed on parole by the state board of parole.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1360, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1844, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-10-102 as it existed prior to 1994.

17-10-103. Action for reimbursement of cost of care.

When any person has been sentenced to confinement in a local jail or a correctional facility or to home detention or has been granted probation or has been placed on parole by the state board of parole and the sentencing court has not entered an order pursuant to section 18-1.3-701, C.R.S., requiring such person to pay the full cost of care incurred during such person's sentence, the state, the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the department of corrections, the judicial department, or any government agency which has incurred cost of care of such person may file an action for reimbursement for cost of care.

In an action filed pursuant to this article, the plaintiff seeking reimbursement for cost of care shall demonstrate that the offender substantially misrepresented such offender's financial status to the sentencing court or that such offender's financial circumstances have changed substantially after sentencing.

If, after a hearing, the court determines that the offender has sufficient assets to pay all or part of the cost of care, the court shall order the offender to make such payments toward the cost of care as are appropriate under the circumstances. In setting the amount of such payments, the court shall take into consideration and make allowances for any restitution ordered to the victim or victims of a crime, which shall take priority over any payments ordered pursuant to this article, and for the maintenance and support of the offender's spouse, dependent children, or any other persons having a legal right to support and maintenance out of the offender's estate. If the offender is confined to a local jail or a correctional facility or is under home detention, the court shall also consider the financial needs of the offender for the six-month period immediately following the offender's release, for the purpose of allowing the offender to seek employment. The court shall determine the amount which shall be paid by the offender for cost of care, which amount shall in no event be in excess of the per capita cost of maintaining prisoners in the local jail or a correctional facility, the per capita cost of maintaining an offender under home detention, the per capita cost of supervising an offender on probation, or the per capita cost of supervising an offender placed on parole, as the case may be.

After the set-offs for restitution and for maintenance and support as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any amounts recovered pursuant to this section that are available to reimburse the costs of providing medical care shall be used to reimburse the state for the state's financial participation for medical assistance if medical care is provided for the inmate or an infant of a female inmate under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1360, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) added, p. 336, § 4, effective April 27; (2) amended, p. 10, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1501, § 161, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 2004, § 58, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-10-104 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-10-104. Action for reimbursement of cost of care - when commenced.

An action may be commenced pursuant to section 17-10-103 against any offender:

At any time during the imprisonment of such offender;

During the period of probation supervision of such offender; or

Within two years after the offender's release from imprisonment or release from probation supervision.

A plaintiff may recover the expenses incurred on behalf of an offender during the entire period the offender has been confined in a correctional facility or a local jail, under home detention, under probation supervision, or placed on parole.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1361, § 4, effective July 1.

17-10-105. Jurisdiction - process.

An action to recover cost of care brought pursuant to this article shall be brought in the district court of any county in which the offender has been confined, supervised on probation, or placed on parole.

The practice and procedure in an action to recover cost of care shall be governed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1361, § 4, effective July 1.

17-10-106. Costs of the action - payment by offender.

If the court determines that the offender has a sufficient estate to pay the cost of care, the court may also order that such offender pay the costs of any action filed pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1361, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-10-106 as it existed prior to 1994.